Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB465.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 502(a) of the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, is amended to read:Section 502. Distribution of proceeds.(a) Distribution.--The proceeds from games of chance received by a club licensee shall be distributed as follows:(1) No less than [60%] 50% of the proceeds shall be paid for public interest purposes within one year of the end of the calendar year in which the proceeds were obtained.(2) No more than [40%] 50% of the proceeds obtained in a 123456789101112131415161718192021 calendar year may be retained by a club licensee.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to calendar years commencing after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0465PN0417 - 2 - 12345